Utah statutes.
13-41-102.   Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

(1)  "Consumer" means a person who acquires a good or service for consumption.

(2)  "Division" means the Division of Consumer Protection.

(3) (a)  "Emergency territory" means the geographical area:

(i)  for which there has been a state of emergency declared; and

(ii)  that is directly affected by the events giving rise to a state of emergency.

(b)  "Emergency territory" does not include a geographical area that is affected by the events giving rise to a state of emergency only by economic market forces.

(4)  "Excessive price" means a price for a good or service that exceeds by more than 10% the average price charged by that person for that good or service in the 30-day period immediately preceding the day on which the state of emergency is declared.

(5)  "Good" means any personal property displayed, held, or offered for sale by a merchant that is necessary for consumption or use as a direct result of events giving rise to a state of emergency.

(6)  "Retail" means the level of distribution where a good or service is typically sold directly, or otherwise provided, to a member of the public who is an end user and does not resell the good or service.

(7)  "Service" means any activity that is performed in whole or in part for the purpose of financial gain including personal service, professional service, rental, leasing, or licensing for use that is necessary for consumption or use as a direct result of events giving rise to a state of emergency.

(8)  "State of emergency" means a declaration of:

(a)  an emergency or major disaster by the president of the United States of America; or

(b)  a state of emergency by the governor under Section 53-2a-206.



Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

